Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3211.03
Districts; change of boundaries, division, or merger; commission; duties.

In making the determinations required by sections 2-3211 to 2-3211.02, the commission shall, whenever consistent with applicable law and the state's interests, give effect to the desires of the affected natural resources districts including the terms of any written agreements between or among such districts.

Laws 1988, LB 1045, § 8.